Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 85.41B of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
All vendors providing services to a state agency shall report
any subcontracting for fulfillment of any terms of the contract
between the vendor and the state agency to both the contracting
agency and Central Purchasing Division of the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services. The report shall include the tasks the
subcontractor completed and the percentage of the total contract
being fulfilled by the subcontractor. The vendor shall file the
report no later than ten (10) days after the conclusion of work
completed by the subcontractor.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 85.41C of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Every current active contract between a state agency and a
private vendor shall be published on a publicly available database
maintained by the Central Purchasing Division of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services. The database shall include:
1. The vendor's name;
2. The total expected cost of the contract;
3. The purchase order number; and
4. The description of deliverables.
B. Subsection A of this section shall not apply if the contract
is related to any information exempted from the Oklahoma Open
Records Act, Section 24A.28 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 85.41D of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
State agencies that purchase or secure services through
statewide contracts shall provide the following documentation to the
Central Purchasing Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services upon entering into an agreement for contracted
services:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3415 Page 2

1. A statement of work that includes the purpose of the
contracted work, the expected deliverables and corresponding due
dates, and metrics for evaluating the success of the engagement;
2. A description of hourly rates with a "not to exceed" rate
that caps the total expense of the contracted work;
3. Supporting documentation that includes line-item expenses;
and
4. Performance contract guarantees to provide recourse to the
contracting agency.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 85.41E of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. State agencies shall perform post-assessment of the
fulfillment of any contracted services within thirty (30) days of
either a key milestone identified within the contract or the
contract term end. This assessment shall include:
1. Whether the contract was completed by the end date
specified;
2. Whether the services were overdue; and
3. Whether the services were over budget.
B. State agencies shall report any incomplete contracts,
regardless of whether the contract is late or on schedule, in their
annual budget submissions and include the estimated time for
completion.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3415 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3415 Page 4